Idaho statutes. Title 28 COMMERCIAL TRANSACTIONS
Part 4
Registration

§ 28-8-401. Duty of issuer to register transfer.

If a certificated security in registered form is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security, the issuer shall register the transfer as requested if:

Under the terms of the security the person seeking registration of transfer is eligible to have the security registered in its name;

The indorsement or instruction is made by the appropriate person or by an agent who has actual authority to act on behalf of the appropriate person;

Reasonable assurance is given that the indorsement or instruction is genuine and authorized (section 28-8-402[, Idaho Code]);

Any applicable law relating to the collection of taxes has been complied with;

The transfer does not violate any restriction on transfer imposed by the issuer in accordance with section 28-8-204[, Idaho Code];

A demand that the issuer not register transfer has not become effective under section 28-8-403[, Idaho Code], or the issuer has complied with section 28-8-403(2)[, Idaho Code], but no legal process or indemnity bond is obtained as provided in section 28-8-403(4)[, Idaho Code]; and

The transfer is in fact rightful or is to a protected purchaser.

If an issuer is under a duty to register a transfer of a security, the issuer is liable to a person presenting a certificated security or an instruction for registration or to the person’s principal for loss resulting from unreasonable delay in registration or failure or refusal to register the transfer.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-401, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873.

§ 28-8-402. Assurance that indorsement or instruction is effective.

An issuer may require the following assurance that each necessary indorsement or each instruction is genuine and authorized:

In all cases, a guaranty of the signature of the person making an indorsement or originating an instruction including, in the case of an instruction, reasonable assurance of identity;

If the indorsement is made or the instruction is originated by an agent, appropriate assurance of actual authority to sign;

If the indorsement is made or the instruction is originated by a fiduciary pursuant to section 28-8-107(1)(d) or (1)(e)[, Idaho Code], appropriate evidence of appointment or incumbency;

If there is more than one (1) fiduciary, reasonable assurance that all who are required to sign have done so; and

If the indorsement is made or the instruction is originated by a person not covered by another provision of this subsection, assurance appropriate to the case corresponding as nearly as may be to the provisions of this subsection.

An issuer may elect to require reasonable assurance beyond that specified in this section.

In this section:

“Guaranty of the signature” means a guaranty signed by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by the issuer to be responsible. An issuer may adopt standards with respect to responsibility if they are not manifestly unreasonable.

“Appropriate evidence of appointment or incumbency” means:

In the case of a fiduciary appointed or qualified by a court, a certificate issued by or under the direction or supervision of the court or an officer thereof and dated within sixty (60) days before the date of presentation for transfer; or

In any other case, a copy of a document showing the appointment or a certificate issued by or on behalf of a person reasonably believed by an issuer to be responsible or, in the absence of that document or certificate, other evidence the issuer reasonably considered appropriate.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-402, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873; am. 2015, ch. 244, § 14, p. 1008.

§ 28-8-403. Demand that issuer not register transfer.

A person who is an appropriate person to make an indorsement or originate an instruction may demand that the issuer not register transfer of a security by communicating to the issuer a notification that identifies the registered owner and the issue of which the security is a part and provides an address for communications directed to the person making the demand. The demand is effective only if it is received by the issuer at a time and in a manner affording the issuer reasonable opportunity to act on it.

If a certificated security in registered form is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer or an instruction is presented to an issuer with a request to register transfer of an uncertificated security after a demand that the issuer not register transfer has become effective, the issuer shall promptly communicate to (i) the person who initiated the demand at the address provided in the demand and (ii) the person who presented the security for registration of transfer or initiated the instruction requesting registration of transfer a notification stating that:

The certificated security has been presented for registration of transfer or instruction for registration of transfer of uncertificated security has been received;

A demand that the issuer not register transfer had previously been received; and

The issuer will withhold registration of transfer for a period of time stated in the notification in order to provide the person who initiated the demand an opportunity to obtain legal process or an indemnity bond.

The period described in subsection (2)(c) of this section may not exceed thirty (30) days after the date of communication of the notification. A shorter period may be specified by the issuer if it is not manifestly unreasonable.

An issuer is not liable to a person who initiated a demand that the issuer not register transfer for any loss the person suffers as a result of registration of a transfer pursuant to an effective indorsement or instruction if the person who initiated the demand does not, within the time stated in the issuer’s communication, either:

Obtain an appropriate restraining order, injunction or other process from a court of competent jurisdiction enjoining the issuer from registering the transfer; or

File with the issuer an indemnity bond, sufficient in the issuer’s judgment to protect the issuer and any transfer agent, registrar or other agent of the issuer involved from any loss it or they may suffer by refusing to register the transfer.

This section does not relieve an issuer from liability for registering transfer pursuant to an indorsement or instruction that was not effective.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-403, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873.

Former § 28-8-403 was repealed. See Prior Laws, § 28-8-101.
Official Comment

The general rule under this Article is that if there has been an effective indorsement or instruction, a person who contends that registration of the transfer would be wrongful should not be able to interfere with the registration process merely by sending notice of the assertion to the issuer. Rather, the claimant must obtain legal process. See Section 8-404. Section 8-403 is an exception to this general rule. It permits the registered owner — but not third parties — to demand that the issuer not register a transfer.

This section is intended to alleviate the problems faced by registered owners of certificated securities who lose or misplace their certificates. A registered owner who realizes that a certificate may have been lost or stolen should promptly report that fact to the issuer, lest the owner be precluded from asserting a claim for wrongful registration. See Section 8-406. The usual practice of issuers and transfer agents is that when a certificate is reported as lost, the owner is notified that a replacement can be obtained if the owner provides an indemnity bond. See Section 8-405. If the registered owner does not plan to transfer the securities, the owner might choose not to obtain a replacement, particularly if the owner suspects that the certificate has merely been misplaced.

Subsection (e) makes clear that this section does not relieve an issuer from liability for registering a transfer pursuant to an ineffective indorsement. An issuer’s liability for wrongful registration in such cases does not depend on the presence or absence of notice that the indorsement was ineffective. Registered owners who are confident that they neither indorsed the certificates, nor did anything that would preclude them from denying the effectiveness of another’s indorsement, see Sections 8-107(b) and 8-406, might prefer to pursue their rights against the issuer for wrongful registration rather than take advantage of the opportunity to post a bond or seek a restraining order when notified by the issuer under this section that their lost certificates have been presented for registration in apparently good order.

Under this section, the owner’s notification that the certificate has been lost would constitute a demand that the issuer not register transfer. No indemnity bond or legal process is necessary. If the original certificate is presented for registration of transfer, the issuer is required to notify the registered owner of that fact, and defer registration of transfer for a stated period. In order to prevent undue delay in the process of registration, the stated period may not exceed thirty days. This gives the registered owner an opportunity to either obtain legal process or post an indemnity bond and thereby prevent the issuer from registering transfer.

§ 28-8-404. Wrongful registration.

Except as otherwise provided in section 28-8-406[, Idaho Code], an issuer is liable for wrongful registration of transfer if the issuer has registered a transfer of a security to a person not entitled to it, and the transfer was registered:

Pursuant to an ineffective indorsement or instruction;

After a demand that the issuer not register transfer became effective under section 28-8-403(1)[, Idaho Code], and the issuer did not comply with section 28-8-403(2)[, Idaho Code];

After the issuer had been served with an injunction, restraining order, or other legal process enjoining it from registering the transfer, issued by a court of competent jurisdiction, and the issuer had a reasonable opportunity to act on the injunction, restraining order or other legal process; or

By an issuer acting in collusion with the wrongdoer.

An issuer that is liable for wrongful registration of transfer under subsection (1) of this section on demand shall provide the person entitled to the security with a like certificated or uncertificated security, and any payments or distributions that the person did not receive as a result of the wrongful registration. If an overissue would result, the issuer’s liability to provide the person with a like security is governed by section 28-8-210[, Idaho Code].

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (1) of this section or in a law relating to the collection of taxes, an issuer is not liable to an owner or other person suffering loss as a result of the registration of a transfer of a security if registration was made pursuant to an effective indorsement or instruction.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-404, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873.

§ 28-8-405. Replacement of lost, destroyed, or wrongfully taken security certificate.

If an owner of a certificated security, whether in registered or bearer form, claims that the certificate has been lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken, the issuer shall issue a new certificate if the owner:

So requests before the issuer has notice that the certificate has been acquired by a protected purchaser;

Files with the issuer a sufficient indemnity bond; and

Satisfies other reasonable requirements imposed by the issuer.

If, after the issue of a new security certificate, a protected purchaser of the original certificate presents it for registration of transfer, the issuer shall register the transfer unless an overissue would result. In that case, the issuer’s liability is governed by section 28-8-210[, Idaho Code]. In addition to any rights on the indemnity bond, an issuer may recover the new certificate from a person to whom it was issued or any person taking under that person, except a protected purchaser.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-405, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873.

§ 28-8-406. Obligation to notify issuer of lost, destroyed or wrongfully taken security certificate.

If a security certificate has been lost, apparently destroyed or wrongfully taken, and the owner fails to notify the issuer of that fact within a reasonable time after the owner has notice of it and the issuer registers a transfer of the security before receiving notification, the owner may not assert against the issuer a claim for registering the transfer under section 28-8-404[, Idaho Code,] or a claim to a new security certificate under section 28-8-405[, Idaho Code].

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-406, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873.

§ 28-8-407. Authenticating trustee, transfer agent, and registrar.

A person acting as authenticating trustee, transfer agent, registrar or other agent for an issuer in the registration of a transfer of its securities, in the issue of new security certificates or uncertificated securities, or in the cancellation of surrendered security certificates has the same obligation to the holder or owner of a certificated or uncertificated security with regard to the particular functions performed as the issuer has in regard to those functions.

History.

I.C.,§ 28-8-407, as added by 1995, ch. 272, § 2, p. 873.

§ 28-8-408. Statements of uncertificated securities. [Repealed.]